Georgia, session 2025_26, HB645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 7 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
regulation of hospitals and related institutions, is amended by repealing and reserving Code
Section 31-7-12.6, relating to SARS CoV-2 testing for residents and staff in long-term care
facilities.
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 31-7-18, relating to vaccinations for
influenza and related items, by replacing "50" with "18" in subsection (a).
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 645
- 1 -